California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Consent of Bondholders [9055. - 9061.]

9055.

The legislative body may enter into a written contract or contracts with the owner or owners of such bonds and provide therein for the cancellation of the outstanding bonds and coupons and the issuance of refunding bonds therefor, subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9056.

When any bond is presented by any person to the legislative body for refunding, such person shall be deemed the owner thereof, and the legislative body may enter into a written contract or contracts to provide for the refunding of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9057.

The contract or contracts shall determine the terms and conditions upon which the outstanding bonds shall be exchanged for the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9058.

The bonds to be refunded may be deposited with the city treasurer or with any duly incorporated bank or trust company doing business in the State, which shall act as depository or escrow holder, as may be designated by contract between the city and the bondholders. The terms of the escrow shall be provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9059.

The State of California or any city, county, or other political subdivision or public corporation, owning any bonds which might be refunded under the provisions of this division may perform all acts and do all things necessary or convenient for the refunding of the bonds under this division and may agree that the bonds be refunded under this division and contract for the refunding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9060.

The city may at any time prior to the actual issuance and exchange of the refunding bonds make additional contracts with any owners of bonds for the surrender and exchange of bonds which are not agreed to be surrendered under the prior contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9061.

If the owners of 75 percent or more of the principal amount of the outstanding bonds of any issue join in the contract or contracts, the city may proceed under this division to refund all of the bonds of that issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nonconsenting Bondholders [9070. - 9076.]

9070.

In the event that the holders of one or more of the outstanding bonds do not enter any contract to refund the same, nevertheless, if the holders of 75 percent or more of the outstanding bonds do contract for the refunding of the bonds owned or held by them the city shall have authority to refund all of the outstanding bonds of said issue under the provisions of this division, but in such event prior to recording the reassessment levied under this division sufficient money to adequately provide for the retirement or payment of the bonds of the nonconsenting holders must be provided and set aside in the proper fund for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9071.

The city which is conducting the refunding proceedings may make an advancement or contribution or an additional contribution in order to provide money to pay or retire the bonds of the nonconsenting holders. In the event the city makes all or any part of such advancement it may reimburse itself entirely or partially by taking all or any part of the refunding bonds at par.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9072.

If any person advances money to provide for the payment or retirement of the bonds of nonconsenting holders the legislative body may deliver at par all or any portion of the refunding bonds which are not to be delivered to consenting bondholders to the person making such advance or advances, or may sell at par all or any part of the refunding bonds not to be delivered to consenting bondholders and from the proceeds thereof reimburse such person, and may contract to make such sale or delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9073.

Any other methods of raising funds for the payment or retirement of the bonds of nonconsenting holders which will, prior to the time the assessment is recorded under this division, adequately provide the money necessary for such payment or retirement is hereby authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9074.

Whenever any money is placed in any fund for the retirement or payment of the bonds of nonconsenting holders such money shall be used only for that purpose. After all of the bonds of the nonconsenting holders have been paid or retired any sum remaining in the fund shall be returned to the city or person which advanced the money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9075.

In the event that the discharge of the bonds of any nonconsenting holders at less than the par value thereof has been authorized by any final decree or order confirming a plan of readjustment under any bankruptcy laws of the United States in any proceedings initiated under the authority of this division or otherwise the legislative body may perform all acts and do all things necessary for the discharge of the bonds in accordance with the decree or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9076.

The reassessment shall not be recorded until adequate provision has been made in accordance with the terms of this article for the payment or retirement of bonds of nonconsenting holders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunding of Two or More Issues [9080. - 9081.]

9080.

Two or more issues of bonds issued under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 may be refunded in one proceeding under this division and only one issue of refunding bonds issued therefor, to be secured by all of the reassessments levied in lieu of the original assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9081.

The proceedings for refunding two or more issues of bonds shall follow as nearly as may be the procedure for the refunding of one issue, with such modifications and changes in the resolutions, notices, reassessment list, bonds, auditor’s report, summons, complaints, and all other proceedings as may be necessary or convenient in carrying through the proceedings, and the legislative body conducting the proceedings is hereby granted full jurisdiction, power, and authority to refund two or more issues of bonds issued under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 in one proceeding under this division and with only one issue of refunding bonds secured by all of the reassessments and to perform all acts, take all steps and proceedings, provide all notices, and do all acts and things necessary or convenient for such refunding and not prohibited by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Reassessment [9100. - 9145.]



  ARTICLE 1. Computing the Reassessment [9100. - 9107.]

9100.

When the contract between the city and 75 percent or more of the bondholders has been entered into, the legislative body shall direct the auditor to submit a complete and accurate statement showing the following:

(a) The total principal amount of the outstanding bonds of the issue to be refunded.

(b) The numbers of the bonds.

(c) The amounts of the due and unpaid interest coupons of the bonds.

(d) The several assessments remaining unpaid and the time in which they become due, together with the interest and penalties on any unpaid installments thereof.

(e) The amount of each reassessment and description of the property upon which such reassessment is proposed to be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9101.

The amount of the reassessment upon any parcel of land shall be computed by the auditor in the following manner:

(a) Subtract from the total amount of unpaid assessments including interest and penalties thereon, if any, on all lands to be reassessed, the amount of the total proposed reassessment.

(b) Prorate the amount of the remainder so ascertained by subtraction, among the respective parcels to be reassessed in accordance with the amounts assessed against each of the parcels in the original assessment.

(c) Subtract the amount so prorated upon any parcel from the total amount of the unpaid assessment, with interest and penalties thereon, if any, on that parcel and the remainder shall constitute the proposed reassessment on such parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

As an alternative method of apportioning the reassessments, the legislative body, if it determines that it appears that the assessments upon some of the lands to be reassessed seem excessive and not in proportion to benefits, may by resolution direct that the superintendent of streets spread the proposed reassessment upon the parcels of land to be reassessed in accordance with the benefits derived from the acquisition or improvement, or acquisition and improvement, to pay for which the outstanding bonds were issued. If the alternative method of apportioning is used the superintendent of streets shall estimate for each parcel to be reassessed the benefits derived from the acquisition or improvement, or acquisition and improvement, to pay for which the outstanding bonds were issued, and shall credit to each parcel all amounts paid upon the assessment (excluding penalties and interest), and the balance remaining after these amounts have been credited shall be the amount of the reassessment upon the parcel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

When the reassessment has been spread under the alternative method, it shall be filed with the auditor and the auditor shall include it in his statement in lieu of the reassessment computed by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

The amount of the reassessment upon any parcel shall not exceed the unpaid amount of the original assessment upon that parcel and the unpaid annual interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

Tax-deeded land shall be subject to reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

Any parcel of land subject to the lien of any assessment securing bonds to be refunded pursuant to this division which has been deeded to any city or other political subdivision or public corporation for delinquent taxes or for delinquent taxes and assessments shall be subject to reassessment under this division. The legislative body of the city or other political subdivision or public corporation may consent to the refunding and reassessment under this division and may do any and all acts and things necessary or convenient to accomplish the refunding of the outstanding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

All money appropriated by the city or county to assist in refunding shall be credited upon the reassessment and shall reduce each of the reassessments therein and shall be prorated among the respective parcels reassessed in accordance with the amounts assessed against each of the parcels in the original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contributions and Appropriations [9125. - 9134.]

9125.

A city proceeding under this division may appropriate money from any available fund to assist in the refunding. Wherever the improvement is a street, bridge, or highway improvement the county in which the city lies is authorized and empowered to appropriate money from any available fund to assist in the refunding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9126.

In addition to the authority contained elsewhere in this division, any city, county, or city and county, district, or other public corporation of any class or kind, in which all or any part of the lands to be reassessed lie, may, at any time, make a contribution or appropriation to aid in the refunding of the outstanding bonds as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9127.

All or any part of the delinquent taxes levied upon lands subject to reassessment in the refunding proceeding for any city, county, or city and county, district, or other public corporation may be contributed or appropriated to aid in the refunding of such indebtedness by the legislative body of the city, county, city and county, district, or other public corporation for which such taxes were levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9128.

Such appropriation or contribution may be of money to be received from the collection of such delinquent taxes or may be made by authorizing the cancellation of the taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9129.

If cancellation as provided in this article is authorized, a certified copy of the resolution making the contribution or appropriation and authorizing the cancellation of the taxes shall be filed with the city or county tax collector, as the case may be. Thereafter the tax collector, the clerk, the auditor, and any other officers having any part in the collection of such taxes or keeping public records thereof, shall, immediately upon the recordation of the reassessment, make the necessary entries canceling the taxes, and the auditor shall certify to the legislative body which made the appropriation or contribution that the taxes described in the resolution have been canceled and annulled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9130.

When any appropriation or contribution is made by authorizing the cancellation of taxes, all interest and penalties on the taxes appropriated or contributed shall be canceled at the same time the taxes are canceled and shall not be deemed a part of the appropriation or contribution and no part of the taxes so canceled and no penalties or interest thereon shall ever be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9131.

The taxes to be appropriated or contributed may be described in the resolution making the appropriation or contribution as all of the taxes for the particular fiscal year or years; and the total amount thereof may be stated in the resolution. No error in the statement of the total amount shall invalidate the appropriation or contribution provided the taxes to be appropriated or contributed are otherwise clearly described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9132.

The resolution making the appropriation or contribution and authorizing the cancellation of taxes shall comply with the following requirements:

(a) It shall be adopted by a two-thirds vote.

(b) It shall find that the public interest and necessity require the contribution or appropriation.

(c) It shall find the general interest of the city, county, city and county, district, or other public corporation of which the body adopting the resolution is the legislative body will be served and promoted by such appropriation or contribution.

(d) It shall find that the refunding to which the appropriation or contribution is made will tend to restore property to the tax roll or keep it upon the tax roll and to promote the improvement and development of the property subject to reassessment in the refunding proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9133.

When an appropriation or contribution of taxes has been made under this article, the county auditor shall compute the amount of the unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest canceled and shall notify the State Controller thereof, and such amount shall be deducted from the amount necessary for a redemption of the property or from the amount for which the property shall be sold when sold by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9134.

Where property has been deeded to the State for delinquent taxes and any appropriation or contribution of any part of the delinquent taxes is made pursuant to the authority conferred in this chapter, the consent of the Controller of the State of California to such appropriation or contribution shall be obtained; and if all taxes for which the sale was made are appropriated or contributed, the deed to the State shall be canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval of Reassessment [9140. - 9145.]

9140.

The statement of the auditor pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter shall be filed with the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9141.

If the legislative body finds the statement of the auditor to be correct upon examination, it shall approve the statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9142.

Upon the approval of the statement of the auditor the legislative body shall adopt a resolution reciting that the statement of the auditor has been approved and is on file with the clerk and that it shows the amount of outstanding bonds and the amount of due and unpaid interest coupons thereof, and the amount of assessments and interest and penalties thereon, together with descriptions of the property upon which reassessments are proposed to be levied, and the amount to be reassessed against each parcel. The resolution shall fix a time and place for hearing on the refunding and reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9143.

The resolution shall also state the total amount of the outstanding bonds, the amount of the due and unpaid interest coupons, the total amount of unpaid assessments including therein interest and penalties on unpaid installments, if any, the amount of the proposed public contribution, if any, the total amount of the proposed reassesssment, the time the refunding bonds shall run, the rate or rates of interest thereon, and shall refer all parties interested to the report on file with the city clerk for the amount of the reassessment proposed to be levied on each parcel of land and for further details.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9144.

If the assessment was spread as provided in Section 9102 the resolution shall state that fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9145.

The resolution shall be published once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Election of Landowners to Pay Original Assessment [9160. - 9165.]

9160.

The owners of property liable to pay assessments have the right to pay such assessments, together with interest thereon as provided by the proceedings and statute under which the outstanding bonds were issued. If the owners of property against which assessments remain unpaid so elect, by written notice given to the legislative body at any time prior to the hearing on the refunding and reassessment they may continue to pay assessments as provided by the proceedings and statute under which the outstanding bonds were issued. The notice shall describe the property upon which the owner elects to continue to pay sufficiently to identify it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9161.

The assessments upon property as to which such written notice has been given shall be paid and collected with interest and penalties thereon as provided by the proceedings and statute under which the bonds to be refunded were issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9162.

Outstanding bonds payable serially as the assessments are payable, and in principal amount equal to the principal of the assessments included in written notices given pursuant to this chapter shall not be canceled in the refunding proceeding but, with interest, shall be payable as provided in the original proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9163.

In the event any property owner elects to continue to pay assessments as provided in this chapter, the proposed reassessment upon his parcel of land as set forth in the statement on file shall be marked “Not to be levied” and no reassessment shall be levied on such parcel in the refunding proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9164.

If in order that the principal amount of outstanding bonds not canceled in the refunding proceedings which is payable annually and interest thereon shall equal the principal amount of assessments made under the original proceedings which are payable annually and interest thereon, it is necessary to reduce the amount of any bond or interest coupon, an appropriate notation showing the amount of reduction shall be written, printed, or stamped upon the face of each bond or coupon reduced in amount. The remaining amount of such bond or coupon shall be payable, collectible, and enforceable in accordance with the provisions of the Improvement Bond Act of 1915.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9165.

If any property owner does not elect to continue to pay assessments as provided in this chapter, then the legislative body shall make a reassessment against his property in the refunding proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Consent of Landowners to Refunding and Reassessment [9180. - 9187.]

9180.

The written consent of the owners of a majority in area of the land subject to reassessment shall be filed with the clerk of the legislative body before the legislative body shall have jurisdiction to confirm any reassessment under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9181.

Any owner of land subject to reassessment may file his consent in writing to the refunding and reassessment upon substantially the terms stated in the resolution provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 3. Such consent need not be in any particular form and no error or informality thereof shall in any manner vitiate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9182.

Owners of land within the meaning of this chapter are those and those only who appear to be such upon the records in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the district is situated on the day that the consents provided for in this chapter are filed with the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9183.

As to any land deeded to a city for delinquent taxes or for delinquent taxes and assessments, the legislative body of the city is authorized to consent to the refunding and reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9184.

As to tax deeded lands the State Controller may sign any consent or consents to the refunding and reassessment for the State, and the board of supervisors of the county in which the property lies may consent to the refunding and reassessment by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9185.

Executors, administrators, special administrators and guardians may consent for any property of the estate represented by them. Any trustee of an express trust of land other than as security for the payment of money may consent for all or any part of the land held in such trust. A trustee in bankruptcy may consent for all or any part of the property of the debtor. Such executors, administrators, guardians and trustees are deemed owners of land within the meaning of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 60.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9186.

At the hearing on the refunding and reassessment the legislative body shall determine whether the written consent of the owners of a majority in area of the lands subject to reassessment has been filed or not and if it determines that such consent has been filed it has jurisdiction to confirm the reassessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9187.

The validity, sufficiency, or genuineness of any of the consents, or the finding and determination of the legislative body thereon, shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless commenced within three months after the determination of the legislative body has been made. Thereafter no person in any action or proceeding may plead or prove that said consents, or any thereof, or the finding and determination of the legislative body thereon, was in any way defective, invalid or insufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Protest and Hearing [9200. - 9208.]

9200.

Any person interested in any of the property to be reassessed may file a written protest against the amount reassessed against his or any other property, as shown in the statement, at any time prior to the time fixed for hearing on the refunding and assessment. The protest shall specifically set forth the nature thereof. Failure to file such written protest shall be a waiver of any right which such person may have or claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9201.

Any person who files such a protest shall have full opportunity to be heard thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

At the time and place fixed for hearing, the legislative body shall hear any complaints or objections that may be made concerning the amount of unpaid assessments, or the amounts of proposed reassessments as to any of the parcels of land to be reassessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

At the hearing no objections to the regularity of the proceedings with reference to the making of the improvement or the validity or the amount of any assessment levied in the original proceedings shall be considered. All other objections to any reassessment shall be deemed waived unless presented at the time and in the manner specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

The determination of the legislative body upon all objections or protests shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

The hearing may be continued from time to time by order entered in the minutes, but must be concluded within 30 days from the date orginally fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9206.

At the hearing the legislative body may review and correct the amount of any reassessments upon any parcel of land, but shall not assess against any parcel of land a greater amount than the total unpaid assessment, with interest and penalties thereon, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9207.

At the conclusion of the hearing the reassessment as originally made or as reviewed and corrected shall be confirmed by resolution entered upon the minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9208.

The resolution of confirmation shall designate by reassessment number or other appropriate designation or description the parcels of land in the statement on file with the clerk upon which the reassessments are confirmed and levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Recordation of Reassessment [9225. - 9231.]

9225.

When the reassessment, as made or as reviewed and corrected, has been confirmed by the legislative body, it shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9226.

When recorded with the superintendent of streets the reassessment shall become a lien upon the various parcels of land assessed and shall be in lieu of the assessments orginally levied thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9227.

Assessments originally levied, and all penalties and interest accrued thereon, shall be deemed superseded and supplanted by the reassessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9228.

The lien of the reassessment shall be given superiority and priority as of the date that the original assessment became a lien upon the property reassessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9229.

Reassessments and each installment thereof and the interest and penalties thereon shall be a lien against the parcels of land on which made, until the same are paid, but for a period not exceeding the time within which an action might be brought on the last series of refunding bonds issued upon the security of the unpaid reassessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9230.

Unmatured installments, interest, and penalties on unpaid reassessments shall not be deemed to be within the terms of any general warranty of title as to any parcel against which a reassessment is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9231.

When refunding bonds are issued, the reassessments and any reassessments which may be issued thereon or in lieu thereof, together with interest thereon, shall remain and constitute a trust fund for the redemption and payment of the refunding bonds and the interest thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Payment and Collection of Reassessments [9250. - 9291.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reassessment Records [9250. - 9255.]

9250.

A copy of the resolution of the legislative body confirming the reassessments upon the security of which the refunding bonds are issued, shall be filed in the office of the auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

The auditor shall keep a record in his office showing the several installments of principal and interest on the reassessments which are to be collected in each year during the term of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

The auditor shall annually enter in his assessment roll on which taxes will next become due, opposite each parcel of land affected, in a space marked “public improvement assessment,” or by other suitable designation, the several installments of such reassessment coming due during the fiscal year covered by such assessment roll, including in each case the interest due on such total unpaid reassessments as herein provided, and also including a percentage of one-fourth of 1 percent of the amount of such installments and of such interest so entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.

The percentages when collected shall cover the expenses and compensation of the treasurer incurred in the collection of such reassessments, and of the interest and penalties thereon. No other percentage shall be claimed for any such collections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

In the event that reassessment collections are made by county officials for a city the county auditor shall at the close of the tax collecting season promptly render to the city auditor a detailed report showing the amounts of installments, interest, penalties, and percentages of reassessments so collected on each proceeding and from what property collected. The report shall also include a statement of the percentages retained for the expenses of making such collections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

If a parcel of land affected by any reassessment is not separately assessed on the roll so that the installment to be collected can be conveniently entered thereon, the auditor shall enter on the roll a description of the parcel affected, with the name of the owners if known, but otherwise described as “unknown owners,” and extend the proper installment opposite the entry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Redemption Fund [9260. - 9263.]

9260.

The treasurer shall keep a redemption fund designated by the name of the bonds, into which he shall place all sums received by him from the collection of the reassessments made for such refunding and upon the security of which the refunding bonds are issued and all interest and penalties thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.

A city proceeding under this division may at its discretion temporarily transfer money into the redemption fund from other funds in which such moneys are not immediately needed. The money so transferred shall be used to pay sums due from the redemption fund and shall be retransferred therefrom out of the first available receipts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

From the redemption fund the treasurer shall disburse and pay the refunding bonds and the interest due thereon upon presention of the proper bonds and coupons. Under no circumstances shall the bonds or the interest thereon be paid out of any other fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

All money in the redemption fund upon the date the statement of the auditor is approved by the legislative body shall be paid to the holders of outstanding bonds and coupons entitled thereto at or prior to the delivery of the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Payment of Entire Assessment [9270. - 9271.]

9270.

Any interested owner may release and pay any unpaid reassessment by depositing with the treasurer of the city the total unpaid balance of such reassessment, together with the total interest which would become due on such reassessment were it paid in the regular way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9271.

If an owner pays a reassessment in a lump sum and the proceeds of that payment are used for the purchase or call of a bond, the person paying the reassessment shall be entitled to credit and reimbursement of his proportion of the interest saved by such purchase or call, less his proportion of any costs incurred for publishing or serving any notice of purchase or call for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment Under Protest [9280. - 9280.]

9280.

Taxpayers shall have the same right to pay such reassessment as so entered with interest, and any penalties thereon, under protest as they have to pay general taxes under protest; but in making payment under protest they must accompany the payment with their written protest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Payment in Installments [9285. - 9291.]

9285.

Reassessments shall bear interest from the date of recording of the reassessment at the rate or rates stated in the refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9286.

For each year the interest shall be computed and collected up to the next second day of July succeeding, no deduction being made by reason of any installment of such reassessment being due or paid prior thereto in such year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9287.

Whenever it appears to the legislative body that according to the dates when taxes are collected in the city there will be an insufficient amount on hand to pay the interest then due, according to the method of collection provided in this division, then the legislative body may direct that such interest or some portion thereof be collected in the year preceding that in which it would otherwise be collected under this division. In that event the interest or portion thereof shall be extended on the rolls for the preceding year and be due and collected therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9288.

If the refunding bonds are payable in annual series, unpaid reassessments shall be payable in annual series corresponding in number to the number or series of bonds issued, and an even annual proportion of each reassessment shall be payable in each year preceding the date of maturity of each of the several series of bonds issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9289.

If the refunding bonds all mature in one year, the unpaid reassessments shall be payable annually and an even annual proportion of each reassessment shall be payable each year preceding the July interest payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9290.

The annual proportion of each reassessment coming due in any year, together with the annual interest on such reassessment, shall be payable in annual or semiannual installments, whichever is the method of collection of the general taxes of such city on real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

9291.

Reassessment installments and the annual interest thereon shall be payable and become delinquent at the same times and in the same proportionate amounts and bear the same proportionate penalties and interest after delinquency as do the general taxes on real property of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Sale for Delinquency [9300. - 9318.]


